Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.122.060

Annual report.

(1) The office, in collaboration with aerospace training or educational programs, shall submit an annual report regarding the aerospace training student loan program to the governor and to the appropriate committees of the legislature.

(2) The annual report shall describe the design and implementation of the aerospace training student loan program, and shall include the following:

(a) The number of applicants for loans;

(b) The number of participants in the loan program;

(c) The number of participants in the loan program who complete an aerospace training or educational program;

(d) The number of participants in the loan program who are placed in employment;

(e) The nature of that employment, including: (i) The type of job; (ii) whether the job is full-time, part-time, or temporary; (iii) whether the job pays annual wages that are: (A) Less than thirty thousand dollars; (B) thirty thousand dollars or greater, but less than sixty thousand dollars; or (C) sixty thousand dollars or more; and

(f) Demographic profiles of applicants for loans and participants in the loan programs.

(3) The annual report shall be submitted by December 1st of each year after July 22, 2011.

[ 2012 c 50 s 8; 2011 c 8 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 50 ss 4-8: See note following RCW 28B.122.010.

Finding—Intent—2012 c 50: See note following RCW 28B.50.903.